Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
Management of Condominium

381.9165.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

Unless stated otherwise in the declaration, a unit owners’ association shall be organized no later than the date the first unit in the condominium is conveyed. The membership of the association shall at all times consist exclusively of all the unit owners or, following termination of the condominium, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under KRS

381.9157

, or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a for-profit or nonprofit corporation or as an unincorporated association.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 33, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9167.
Powers of unit owners’ association — Emergency assessments.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association, even if unincorporated, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves, and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;

Hire and discharge managers and other employees, agents, and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two (2) or more unit owners on matters affecting the condominium;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of common elements, and authorize access to any unit for those purposes;

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property, except that common elements may only be conveyed or subjected to a lien or security interest as provided in KRS

381.9185

;

Grant easements, leases, licenses, and concessions through or over the common elements;

Impose and receive payments, fees, or charges:

For the use, rental, or operation of the common elements other than limited common elements described in KRS 381.9127(2), (4), and (6);

For services provided to unit owners; and

To cover emergency or extraordinary circumstances affecting the condominium or any part thereof;

Impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association that may include reimbursement to the association of reasonable fees and costs, including attorney fees, associated with the enforcement of this paragraph;

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration, certificates required by KRS

381.9203

, or statements of unpaid assessments, except that:

Any fee imposed for the preparation of a certificate shall not exceed the lesser of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) or eighty percent (80%) of the current monthly assessment fee charged that unit by the association; and

No more than fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to update a previous certificate issued in the same fiscal year of the association;

Provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments, for the purpose of securing financial accommodations obtained by the association to perform its duties and obligations under the declaration or KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this Commonwealth by legal entities of the same type as the association; and

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration shall not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

Notwithstanding the declaration, an association may impose an emergency assessment against any unit affected to:

Comply with a judicial order; or

Repair an emergency condition of any common structural, utility, or mechanical component which has made, or is in imminent danger of making, any unit, common element, or limited common element unsafe, uninhabitable, or uninsurable, provided the association is first provided an opinion affixed with a professional seal from a professional engineer or licensed architect stating the emergency condition.

The emergency assessment provided for in subsection (3) of this section shall be made upon the vote of:

A simple majority of unit owners present at a special called meeting. If the declaration does not provide for special meetings, one (1) may be called under this subsection to address the issues identified in subsection (3) of this section; or

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the members of the association’s executive board.

Any emergency assessment made under this subsection may be reduced or rescinded by a vote of a simple majority of total unit owners at a special meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 34, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 4, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9169.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, or subsection (2) of this section, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the executive board shall act in accordance with KRS

381.9170

.

The executive board shall not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration, to terminate the condominium, or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers, and duties, or terms of office of executive board members, but the executive board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term.

If the executive board adopts a budget for the condominium, the board shall:

Provide a summary of the budget to all unit owners within thirty (30) days after the adoption; and

If the adopted budget contains an increase of greater than fifteen percent (15%) from the previous year’s budget, set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget, which meeting shall not be less than fourteen (14) days nor more than thirty (30) days after providing the summary. The budget shall be deemed ratified, whether or not a quorum is present, unless at that meeting a majority of all the unit owners, or any larger vote specified in the declaration, reject the budget. If the budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified by the unit owners shall be continued until such time as a subsequent budget is adopted by the executive board in conformity with this subsection.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by him or her, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of:

Sixty (60) days after conveyance of seventy-five percent (75%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant;

Two (2) years after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary course of business;

Two (2) years after any development right to add new units was last exercised; or

Seven (7) years after the first unit was conveyed to a unit owner other than a declarant.

A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before termination of that period, but in that event he or she may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

Not later than sixty (60) days after conveyance of twenty-five percent (25%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one (1) member and not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the members of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than sixty (60) days after conveyance of fifty percent (50%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than thirty-three and one-third percent (33-1/3%) of the members of the executive board shall be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board of at least three (3) members, a majority of whom shall be unit owners or owners of equity interests in units. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers shall take office upon election.

Any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary notwithstanding, the unit owners, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 35, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 5, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9170.
Discharge of board member’s duties — Standards for monetary damages
and injunctive relief.

A board member shall discharge his or her duties as an officer or a member of the executive board, including his or her duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

On an informed basis; and

In a manner he or she honestly believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

Such board member shall be considered to discharge his or her duties on an informed basis if he or she makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the association, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.

In discharging his or her duties, such board member shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the association whom the board member honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director honestly believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the executive board of which he or she is not a member if the board member honestly believes the committee merits confidence.

A board member of an association shall not be considered to act in good faith if he or she has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted.

In addition to any other limitation on such board member’s liability for monetary damages contained in any provision of the association’s articles of incorporation adopted in accordance with state law, any action taken as a board member, or any failure to take any action as a board member, shall not be the basis for monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:

The board member has breached or failed to perform the duties of the board member’s office in compliance with this section; and

In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for human rights, safety, or property.

A person bringing an action for monetary damages under this section shall have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach or failure to perform was the legal cause of the damages suffered.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 99, § 11, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9171.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant right created or reserved under KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every county in which any portion of the condominium is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon him or her by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

. Lack of privity does not deprive any unit owner of standing to maintain an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor;

If a successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the condominium;

If a transferor retains any special declarant right, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer; and

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage, in case of foreclosure of a mortgage, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings, of any units owned by a declarant or real estate in a condominium subject to development rights, a person acquiring title to all the real estate being foreclosed or sold, but only upon his or her request, succeeds to all special declarant rights related to that real estate held by that declarant. The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.

Upon foreclosure, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under Bankruptcy Code or receivership proceedings, of all units and other real estate in a condominium owned by a declarant:

The declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights; and

The period of declarant control terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or by the declaration;

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection, who is not an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or the declaration:

On a declarant which relate to his or her exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

On his or her transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant, or made before the condominium was created;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or his or her appointees to the executive board; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer;

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs, if he or she is not an affiliate of a declarant, shall not exercise any other special declarant right, and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant; and

A successor to all special declarant rights held by his or her transferor who is not an affiliate of that declarant and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to units under subsection (3) of this section, may declare his or her intention in a recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor shall not exercise any of those rights other than a right held by his or her transferor to control the executive board in accordance with KRS 381.9169(4) for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, he or she is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his or her acts and omissions under KRS 381.9169(4).

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

or the declaration.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 36, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9173.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association shall provide for:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of a president, treasurer, secretary, and any other officers of the association the bylaws specify;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 37, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9175.
Upkeep of condominium — Expenses and income in connection with real estate subject to development rights.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, KRS 381.9187(6), or as otherwise provided by the declaration, the association is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of his or her unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association and the other unit owners, and to their agents or employees, access through his or her unit reasonably necessary for those purposes. If damage is inflicted on the common elements, or on any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner responsible for the damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the prompt repair thereof.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under KRS

381.9101

to

381.9207

, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights. No other unit owner and no other portion of the condominium is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 38, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 13, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9177.
Meetings of the association.

A meeting of the association shall be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the executive board, or by unit owners having twenty percent (20%), or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association. Not less than ten (10) days nor more than sixty (60) days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. The notice of any meeting shall state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 39, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9179.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast ten percent (10%) of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast fifty percent (50%) of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 40, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 6, effective April 11, 2012.

381.9181.
Voting — Proxies.

If only one (1) of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, he or she is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one (1) of the multiple owners of a unit are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one (1) of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one (1) person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section, except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. A proxy terminates one (1) year after its date, unless it specifies a shorter term.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the condominium be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units:

Subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply to lessees as if they were unit owners;

Unit owners who have leased their units to other persons shall not cast votes on those specified matters;

Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners; and

Unit owners shall also be given notice, as provided in KRS

381.9177

, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 41, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9183.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant shall be liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the condominium which that declarant has the responsibility to maintain.

An action alleging a wrong done by the association shall be brought against the association and not against any unit owner.

If the wrong occurred during any period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association shall be liable to the association or to any unit owner:

For all tort losses not covered by insurance suffered by the association or that unit owner; and

For all costs which the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract or other wrongful act or omission.

Whenever the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant shall be liable for all litigation expenses, including reasonable attorneys fees, incurred by the association.

Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates. A unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because he or she is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association. Liens resulting from judgments against the association shall be governed by KRS

381.9195

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 42, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9185.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a lien or security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association, including eighty percent (80%) of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; however, all the owners of units to which any limited common element is allocated shall agree in order to convey that limited common element or subject it to a lien or security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association.

An agreement to convey common elements or subject them to a lien or security interest shall be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement shall specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before that date. The agreement and all ratifications thereof shall be recorded in every county in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and shall be effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey common elements, or subject them to a lien or security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other voluntary transfer of common elements, unless made pursuant to this section, shall be void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section shall not deprive any unit of its rights of access and support.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, a conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not affect the priority or validity of pre-existing encumbrances.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 43, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9187.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements insuring against fire and extended coverage perils and such other risks as may be determined by the association. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the executive board but not less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements.

If the insurance described in subsection (1) of this section is not reasonably available, the association shall immediately cause notice of that fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall provide that:

Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of his or her interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or member of his or her household;

No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of his or her authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any mortgagee. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear. Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the proceeds shall be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lienholders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or the condominium is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association shall not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for his or her own benefit.

Disposition of insurance proceeds shall be made as follows:

Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section and which is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless:

The condominium is terminated;

Repair or replacement would be illegal under any state statute or local health or safety ordinance; or

Eighty percent (80%) of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned limited common element which will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild.

The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves shall be a common expense;

If the entire condominium is not repaired or replaced:

The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements shall be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium;

The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements which are not rebuilt shall be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear; and

The remainder of the proceeds shall be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common element interests of all the units.

If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been acquired by eminent domain under KRS

381.9113

, and the association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, KRS

381.9157

governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a condominium all of whose units are restricted to nonresidential use.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 44, effective January 1, 2011; 2012, ch. 99, § 7, effective April 11, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/11/2012). In subsection (4) of this statute, a reference to “subsection (7)” has been changed to read “subsection (6),” in conformity with the renumbering of subsections under 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 99, sec. 7. The Reviser of Statutes has made this correction of
a manifest clerical or typographical error under KRS 7.136(1).

381.9189.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses and any prepayment of reserves may be paid to the unit owners in proportion to their common expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 45, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9191.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments shall be made at least annually and based on a budget adopted at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, all common expenses shall be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to KRS 381.9137(1). Any past due common expense assessment or installment thereof shall bear interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding eighteen percent (18%) per year.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element shall be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion thereof benefiting fewer than all of the units shall be assessed exclusively against the units benefited; and

The costs of insurance shall be assessed in proportion to risk and the costs of utilities shall be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments may be made to pay a judgment against the association and, if made, shall only be made against the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the misconduct of any unit owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against his or her unit.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 46, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9193.
Lien for assessments.

The association shall have a lien on a unit for any assessment levied against that unit or fines imposed against its unit owner from the time the assessment or fine becomes due and, if the assessment is payable in installments, the lien shall be for the full amount of the assessment at the time the first installment becomes due. The association’s lien may be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate. Unless the declaration otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, reasonable collection costs, attorney fees, fines, and interest charged pursuant to KRS 381.9167(1)(j) to (l), shall be secured by the lien and enforceable as assessments under this section.

A lien under this section shall take priority over all other liens and encumbrances on a unit, except:

Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the declaration;

A mortgage on the unit recorded before the date on which the assessment sought to be enforced became delinquent; and

Liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the unit.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, if two (2) or more associations have liens for assessments created at any time on the same real estate, those liens shall have equal priority.

Recording of the declaration constitutes record notice and perfection of the lien. No further recordation of any claim of lien for assessment under this section shall be required.

A lien for unpaid assessments shall be extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within five (5) years after the full amount of the assessments becomes due.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit actions or suits to recover sums for which subsection (1) of this section creates a lien or to prohibit an association from taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

A judgment or decree in any action brought under this section shall include costs and reasonable attorney’s fees for the prevailing party.

The association shall, upon written request, provide a unit owner a recordable statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against his or her unit. The statement shall be delivered within ten (10) business days after receipt of the request and shall be binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 47, effective January 1, 2011.

381.9195.
Other liens affecting the condominium.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a judgment for money against the association, if recorded, shall not be a lien on the common elements but shall be a lien in favor of the judgment lienholder against all of the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered. No other property of a unit owner shall be subject to the claims of creditors of the association.

If the association has granted a lien or security interest in the common elements to a creditor of the association pursuant to KRS

381.9185

, the holder of that lien or security interest shall exercise its right against the common elements before its judgment lien on any unit may be enforced.

Whether perfected before or after the creation of the condominium, if a lien other than a mortgage, including a judgment lien or lien securing the obligation to pay for work performed or materials supplied before creation of the condominium, becomes effective against two (2) or more units, the unit owner of an affected unit may pay to the lienholder the amount of the lien attributable to his or her unit, and the lienholder, upon receipt of payment, shall promptly deliver a release of the lien covering that unit. The amount of the payment shall be proportionate to the ratio which that unit owner’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liabilities of all unit owners whose units are subject to the lien. After payment, the association shall not assess or have a lien against that unit owner’s unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

A judgment against the association shall be indexed in the name of the condominium and the association and, when so indexed, shall be notice of the lien against the units.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 97, § 48, effective January 1, 2011.